Washington statutes.
RCW 13.50.010

Definitions—Conditions when filing petition or information—Duties to maintain accurate records and access—Confidential child welfare records.

(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Detention facility" means:

(i) Any detention facility as defined under RCW 13.40.020; and

(ii) Any juvenile correctional facility under alternative administration operated by a consortium of counties under RCW 13.04.035;

(b) "Good faith effort to pay" means a juvenile offender has either (i) paid the principal amount in full; (ii) made at least 80 percent of the value of full monthly payments within the period from disposition or deferred disposition until the time the amount of restitution owed is under review; or (iii) can show good cause why he or she paid an amount less than 80 percent of the value of full monthly payments;

(c) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following: Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney, detention center, attorney general, the oversight board for children, youth, and families, the office of the family and children's ombuds, the department of social and health services and its contracting agencies, the department of children, youth, and families and its contracting agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight committee created under RCW 72.05.415;

(d) "Managed care organization" and "behavioral health administrative services organization" have the same meanings as in RCW 71.24.025;

(e) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions, memorandums, briefs, notices of hearing or appearance, service documents, witness and exhibit lists, findings of the court and court orders, agreements, judgments, decrees, notices of appeal, as well as documents prepared by the clerk, including court minutes, letters, warrants, waivers, affidavits, declarations, invoices, and the index to clerk papers;

(f) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the case;

(g) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the records and reports of the probation counselor.

(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately from the official juvenile court file.

(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to maintain accurate records. To this end:

(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information. Any information in records maintained by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;

(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of its records and prevent tampering with them; and

(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to ensure the completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies with respect to matters in its files.

(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries concerning records.

(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain confidential.

(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or destroyed.

(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes. Each person granted permission to inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.

(9) The court shall release to the caseload forecast council the records needed for its research and data-gathering functions. Access to caseload forecast data may be permitted by the council for research purposes only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records or information will be preserved.

(10) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the caseload forecast council upon request. The commission shall not disclose the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without the named individual's written permission.

(11) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority to compel disclosure shall not apply to the oversight board for children, youth, and families or the office of the family and children's ombuds.

(12) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the research copy is restricted to the administrative office of the courts for research purposes as authorized by the supreme court or by state statute. The administrative office of the courts shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy. Data contained in the research copy may be shared with other governmental agencies as authorized by state statute, pursuant to data-sharing and research agreements, and consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.270 and 13.50.100(3).

(13) The court shall release to the Washington state office of public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records.

(14) The court shall release to the Washington state office of civil legal aid records needed to implement the agency's oversight, technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.53.045. Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington state office of civil legal aid. The Washington state office of civil legal aid shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records, and shall, as soon as possible, destroy any retained notes or records obtained under this section that are not necessary for its functions related to RCW 2.53.045.

(15) For purposes of providing for the educational success of youth in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with meeting the educational needs of current and former foster youth to another state agency or state agency's contracted provider responsible under state law or contract for assisting current and former foster youth to attain educational success. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

(16) For the purpose of ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose to the department of commerce and its contracted providers responsible under state law or contract for providing services to youth, only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to ensuring the safety and welfare of the youth who are in foster care who are admitted to crisis residential centers or HOPE centers under contract with the office of homeless youth prevention and protection. Records disclosed under this subsection retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and may not be further disclosed except as permitted by this chapter and federal law.

(17) For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health and well-being of children in foster care to the department of social and health services, the health care authority, or their contracting agencies. For purposes of investigating and preventing child abuse and neglect, and to provide for the coordination of health care and the well-being of children in foster care, the department of social and health services and the health care authority may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with investigation and prevention of child abuse and neglect, or may assist with providing for the health care coordination and the well-being of children in foster care to the department of children, youth, and families, or its contracting agencies. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

(18) For the purpose of investigating child sexual abuse, online sexual exploitation and commercial sexual exploitation of minors, and child fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal neglect cases for the well-being of the child, the department of children, youth, and families may disclose only those confidential child welfare records that pertain to or may assist with such an investigation pursuant to RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.175. The records retain their confidentiality pursuant to this chapter and federal law and cannot be further disclosed except as allowed under this chapter and federal law.

(19) The records of a person confined in a detention facility may be made available to managed care organizations and behavioral health administrative services organizations as defined in RCW 71.24.025 for the purpose of care coordination activities. The receiving organization must hold records in confidence and comply with all relevant state and federal statutes regarding privacy of disclosed records.

[ 2024 c 99 s 1. Prior: 2019 c 470 s 22; 2019 c 82 s 1; 2018 c 58 s 78; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 312; 2017 c 277 s 1; prior: 2016 c 93 s 2; 2016 c 72 s 109; 2016 c 71 s 2; prior: 2015 c 265 s 2; 2015 c 262 s 1; prior: 2014 c 175 s 2; 2014 c 117 s 5; 2013 c 23 s 6; 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 30; 2010 c 150 s 3; 2009 c 440 s 1; 1998 c 269 s 4; prior: 1997 c 386 s 21; 1997 c 338 s 39; 1996 c 232 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 541; 1993 c 374 s 1; 1990 c 246 s 8; 1986 c 288 s 11; 1979 c 155 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—Intent—2016 c 72: See note following RCW 28A.600.015.

Intent—2016 c 71: See note following RCW 28A.300.590.

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: "The legislature finds that requiring juvenile offenders to pay all legal financial obligations before being eligible to have a juvenile record administratively sealed disproportionately affects youth based on their socioeconomic status. Juveniles who cannot afford to pay their legal financial obligations cannot seal their juvenile records once they turn eighteen and oftentimes struggle to find employment. By eliminating most nonrestitution legal financial obligations for juveniles convicted of less serious crimes, juvenile offenders will be better able to find employment and focus on making restitution payments first to the actual victim. This legislation is intended to help juveniles understand the consequences of their actions and the harm that those actions have caused others without placing insurmountable burdens on juveniles attempting to become productive members of society. Depending on the juvenile's ability to pay, and upon the consent of the victim, courts should also strongly consider ordering community restitution in lieu of paying restitution where appropriate." [ 2015 c 265 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2014 c 175: "The legislature finds that:

(1) The primary goal of the Washington state juvenile justice system is the rehabilitation and reintegration of former juvenile offenders. The public has a compelling interest in the rehabilitation of former juvenile offenders and their successful reintegration into society as active, law-abiding, and contributing members of their communities. When juvenile court records are publicly available, former juvenile offenders face substantial barriers to reintegration, as they are denied housing, employment, and education opportunities on the basis of these records.

(2) The legislature declares it is the policy of the state of Washington that the interest in juvenile rehabilitation and reintegration constitutes compelling circumstances that outweigh the public interest in continued availability of juvenile court records. The legislature intends that juvenile court proceedings be openly administered but, except in limited circumstances, the records of these proceedings be closed when the juvenile has reached the age of eighteen and completed the terms of disposition." [ 2014 c 175 s 1.]

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Alphabetization—1998 c 269: "The code reviser shall alphabetize the definitions in RCW 13.50.010 and 74.15.020 and correct any references." [ 1998 c 269 s 18.]

Intent—Finding—Effective date—1998 c 269: See notes following RCW 72.05.020.

Application—1997 c 386: "Sections 8 through 14 and 17 through 34 of this act apply only to incidents occurring on or after January 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 386 s 67.]

Effective date—1997 c 386: "Sections 8 through 13 and 21 through 34 of this act take effect January 1, 1998." [ 1997 c 386 s 68.]

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.

Effective dates—1996 c 232: See note following RCW 13.40.030.

Application—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 540-545: "Sections 540 through 545 of this act shall apply to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1994." [ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 917.]

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Severability—1990 c 246: See note following RCW 13.34.060.

Severability—1986 c 288: See note following RCW 43.185C.260.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.